North Dakota, session 69, HB1340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 39-21-39 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4. An individual may not operate a motor vehicle with any object, material, or tinting displayed,
affixed, or applied on the front windshield or any window unless the object, material, or tinting
in conjunction with the windshield upon which it is displayed, affixed, or applied has a light
transmittance of at least seventy percent or the object, material, or tinting in conjunction with a
window other than the windshield upon which it is displayed, affixed, or applied has a light
transmittance of at least fifty thirty - five percent. This subsection does not apply to windows
behind the operator if the motor vehicle is equipped with outside mirrors on both sides
thatwhich meet the requirements of section 39-21-38.

H. B. NO. 1340 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1340.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 2 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State